New York, session 2025-2026, A7502.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The banking law is amended by adding a new section 9-e to 2 read as follows: 3 § 9-e. Deposit of state issued checks. No banking institution, as 4 defined in section nine-f of this article, shall hold for deposit the 5 funds from a check issued by the state. 6 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 7 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10711-01-5